Indiana, session 2026, HB1404.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 22-6-1-0.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 0.5. This chapter does not apply to a case that is
brought under IC 34-26-6 to protect an employee from unlawful
violence or a credible threat of violence solely related to a dispute
arising between two (2) employees over their own personal
controversy if the dispute does not involve claims governed by a
collective bargaining agreement.
2026 IN 1404—LS 7055/DI 141